Nevada, session 83, SB110.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 201.301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
201.301 1. A person is guilty of facilitating sex trafficking if
the person:
(a) Facilitates, arranges, provides or pays for the transportation
of a person to or within this State with the intent of:
(1) Inducing the person to engage in prostitution in violation
of subparagraph (1), (2) or (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
NRS 201.300;
(2) Inducing the person to enter any place within this State in
which prostitution is practiced, encouraged or allowed for the
purpose of sexual conduct or prostitution in violation of
-
*SB110*

– 2 –
subparagraph (1), (2) or (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS
201.300; or
(3) If the person is a child, using the person for any act that is
prohibited by NRS 200.710 or 200.720;
(b) Sells travel services that facilitate the travel of another
person to this State with the knowledge that the other person is
traveling to this State for the purpose of:
(1) Engaging in sexual conduct with a person who has been
induced to engage in sexual conduct or prostitution in violation
of subparagraph (1), (2) or (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of
NRS 201.300;
(2) Soliciting a child who has been induced to engage in
sexual conduct or prostitution in violation of subparagraph (1), (2)
or (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 201.300; or
(3) Engaging in any act involving a child that is prohibited
by NRS 200.710 or 200.720; or
(c) Travels to or within this State by any means with the intent
of engaging in:
(1) Sexual conduct with a person who has been induced to
engage in sexual conduct or prostitution in violation of
subparagraph (1), (2) or (3) of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS
201.300, with the knowledge that such a person has been induced to
engage in such sexual conduct or prostitution; or
(2) Any act involving a child that is prohibited by NRS
200.710 or 200.720.
2. A person who is found guilty of facilitating sex trafficking is
guilty of a category B felony and:
(a) If the victim is 18 years of age or older, shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than [1 year] 2 years and a maximum term of not more than [6] 10
years.
(b) If the victim is [less] at least 16 years of age but not more
than 18 years of age, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state
prison for a minimum term of not less than [3] 4 years and a
maximum term of not more than 10 years.
(c) If the victim is at least 14 years of age but not more than 16
years of age, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison
for a minimum term of not less than 6 years and a maximum term
of not more than 20 years.
(d) If the victim is less than 14 years of age, shall be punished
by imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not
less than 10 years and a maximum term of not more than 20 years.
H
-
*SB110*